Illinois, session 104th, HB5224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 1-110 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/1-110 new)7    Sec. 1-110. Electronic filing systems.8    (a) For purposes of this Section, "electronic filing 9system" or "system" means any electronic system approved by or 10maintained by the Supreme Court of Illinois, a State agency, 11or a unit of local government for the filing of documents.12    (b) As soon as reasonably practicable after an electronic 13filing system receives and files a document, the system shall 14electronically notify the court, State agency, or unit of 15local government in which the document was filed of the 16filing, the person who requested the document to be filed, and 17the persons and entities on whom the document was served by the 18system.19    (c) The electronic notice in subsection (b) is proof of 20filing and service of that document, and no additional proof 21of filing or service of that document is required.22    (d) Proof of service of documents on persons or entities 23who do not receive service from the electronic filing system   HB5224- 2 -LRB104 20280 JRC 33731 b1shall be as otherwise required by law.